Wyoming statutes. Title 26 Insurance Code
Article 1. Administration of Deposits

§ 26-8-101.
Authorized deposits of insurers.

The following deposits of insurers when made through the commissioner shall be accepted and held, subject to this chapter:

Deposits required under this code [title 26] for authority to transact insurance in this state;

Deposits of domestic insurers if made pursuant to the laws of other states, provinces and countries as a requirement for authority to transact insurance therein;

Deposits in any additional amounts permitted under W.S. 26-8-109(b).

History.

Laws 1917, ch. 93, § 1; C.S. 1920, § 5251; R.S. 1931, § 57-409; C.S. 1945, § 52-1009; W.S. 1957, §§ 26-26, 26.1-139; Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 139; 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to deposits required of insurers, see §

26-3-111

.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 26-8-102.
Purposes for holding deposits.

Deposits shall be held for purposes as follows:

Deposits made in this state under W.S.

26-3-111

shall be held in trust for the purposes stated in that section;

A deposit made in this state by a domestic insurer transacting insurance in another state, province or country, as required by the laws thereof, shall be held in trust for the protection of all the insurer’s policyholders or all its policyholders and creditors or for any other purpose specified by those laws;

A deposit required under W.S.

26-3-130

shall be held for purposes specified by the commissioner’s order pursuant to which the deposit is to be made.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 140; W. S. 1957, § 26.1-140; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 26-8-103.
Securities eligible for deposit.

Any deposits required under W.S.

26-3-111

for authority to transact insurance in this state shall consist of any combination of certificates of deposit issued by solvent banks, public obligations as described in W.S. 26-7-107(a)(i) or corporate obligations described in W.S. 26-7-107(a)(iii).

Any other deposits of a domestic insurer held in this state pursuant to the laws of another state, province or country shall be comprised of assets described in subsection (a) of this section and of any additional securities required or permitted by those laws, except common stocks, mortgages of any kind and real property.

Deposits of foreign insurers made in this state under W.S.

26-3-130

shall consist of assets the commissioner requires pursuant to that law.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 141; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-141; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-8-104.
Depository.

Deposits made in this state under this code [title 26] shall be made through and with the commissioner’s approval in safe deposit with an established safe deposit institution, bank or trust company located in this state and selected by the insurer.

If the deposit is kept in safe deposit, the box or compartment in which are kept the assets and securities comprising the deposit shall be placed in a fireproof safe deposit vault and shall require two (2) distinctly differing keys to open it. One (1) of the keys shall at all times be kept by the commissioner and the other key shall at all times be kept by the insurer. The box or compartment shall not at any time be opened or remain open except through the joint action and in the presence of both the commissioner and the insurer’s authorized representative.

The insurer shall pay the customary fees for the safekeeping of its deposit.

History.

Laws 1917, ch. 93, § 2; C.S. 1920, § 5252; R.S. 1931, § 57-410; C.S. 1945, § 52-1010; W.S. 1957, §§ 26-27, 26.1-142; Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 142; 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-8-105.
Custodial arrangements.

Instead of deposit into safe deposit as provided in W.S.

26-8-104

, upon the insurer’s written request the commissioner may permit the insurer to make and maintain the deposit under custodial arrangements with the trust department of an established bank located in Wyoming.

With the commissioner’s written advance approval, the insurer may deposit certain of its securities under custodial arrangements with an established bank or trust company located outside this state, if the custodial bank or trust company issues original receipts for those securities and they are held in safe deposit or custody subject to the requirements of W.S. 26-8-104(b) or subsection (a) of this section.

The form and terms of all such custodial arrangements shall be as the commissioner prescribes or approves consistent with the applicable provisions of this code [title 26].

The insurer shall bear the costs of custodial arrangements.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 143; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-143; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-8-106.
Commissioner's record of deposits; vouchers as to assets deposited.

The commissioner shall:

Give the depositing insurer vouchers as to assets deposited with him;

Keep a record of the assets comprising each insurer’s deposit, showing as far as practical the amount and market value of each item and each of his transactions relative thereto.

History.

Laws 1917, ch. 93, § 1; C.S. 1920, § 5251; R.S. 1931, § 57-409; C.S. 1945, § 52-1009; W.S. 1957, § 26-26, 26.1-144; Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 144; 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 26-8-107.
Assignment or transfer of securities deposited to commissioner.

Any assets deposited by an insurer and not negotiable by delivery shall be assigned or transferred to the commissioner and his successors in office. Upon release of any such security or asset to the insurer, the commissioner shall reassign or transfer the security or asset to the insurer.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, §§ 117, 145; W.S. 1957, §§ 26.1-117, 26.1-145; W.S. 1977, §§

26-7-108

,

26-8-107

; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to assignment or transfer of investment securities under the Uniform Commercial Code, see §§ 34.1-8-101 through 34.1-8-603.

§ 26-8-108.
Appraisal of securities deposited.

Prior to acceptance for deposit of any asset, or at any time thereafter while so deposited, the commissioner may have the asset appraised or valued by competent appraisers. The insurer shall bear the reasonable costs of the appraisal or valuation.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 146; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-146; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-8-109.
When excess deposits may be required.

If assets deposited by an insurer under this chapter are subject to material fluctuations in market value, the commissioner may require the insurer to deposit and maintain on deposit additional assets in an amount reasonably necessary to assure that the deposit at all times has a market value of not less than the amount specified under the law by which the deposit is required.

An insurer not required to make additional deposits may deposit assets in an amount exceeding its deposit required or otherwise permitted under this code [title 26] by not more than twenty percent (20%) of the required or permitted deposit, or twenty thousand dollars ($20,000.00), whichever is larger, for the purpose of absorbing fluctuations in the value of assets deposited and to facilitate exchange and substitution of those assets. During the insurer’s solvency any excess deposit shall be released to the insurer upon its request. During the insurer’s insolvency, an excess deposit shall be released only as provided in W.S. 26-8-113(d).

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 147; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-147; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

Cross references. —

For provision as to deposit required of insurers, see §

26-3-111

.

§ 26-8-110.
Rights of solvent insurer.

If the insurer is solvent and in compliance with this code [title 26] it may:

Demand, receive, sue for and recover the income from the assets deposited;

Exchange and substitute for the deposited assets, or any part thereof, other eligible securities and assets of equivalent or greater market value; and

At any reasonable time inspect its deposit.

History.

Laws 1917, ch. 93, § 2; C.S. 1920, § 5252; R.S. 1931, § 57-410; C.S. 1945, § 52-1010; W.S. 1957, § 26-27, 26.1-148; Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 148; 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 26-8-111.
Levy upon deposit.

No judgment creditor or other claimant of an insurer has the right to levy upon any of the assets held in this state as a deposit for the protection of the insurer’s policyholders or creditors or both. As to a deposit made pursuant to W.S.

26-3-111

, levy on that deposit is permitted if provided in the commissioner’s order under which the deposit is required.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 149; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-149; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-8-112.
Deficiency of deposit; failure to cure.

If for any reason the market value of an insurer’s assets held on deposit in this state as required under this code [title 26] falls below the required amount, the insurer shall promptly deposit other or additional assets eligible for deposit sufficient to cure the deficiency. If the insurer fails to cure the deficiency within twenty (20) days after receipt of notice thereof by registered or certified mail from the commissioner, the commissioner shall revoke the insurer’s certificate of authority.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 150; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-150; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

Cross references. —

For provision as to deposit required of insurers, see §

26-3-111

.

§ 26-8-113.
Duration and release of deposit.

Any deposit an insurer makes in this state pursuant to this code [title 26], including assets held in another state under custodial arrangements permitted by W.S. 26-8-105(b), shall be held as long as:

There is outstanding any liability of the insurer as to which the deposit was so required; or

The basis of retaliation exists if the deposit was required under W.S.

26-3-130

.

Upon a domestic insurer’s request, the commissioner shall return to the insurer the whole or any portion of its assets held on deposit if the commissioner is satisfied that the assets to be returned are not subject to liability and are not required to be longer held by any provision of law or purposes of the original deposit. If the insurer has reinsured all its outstanding risks in another insurer authorized to transact insurance in this state, the commissioner shall deliver the assets and securities to the insurer assuming the risks, upon the domestic insurer’s written notice that the assets have been assigned and transferred to the reinsuring insurer. The notice shall be accompanied by a verified copy of the assignment or transfer.

The commissioner shall return any deposit made in this state by a foreign insurer, if that insurer ceases transacting insurance in this state and is not subject to any liability in this state for which the deposit was held.

If the insurer is subject to delinquency proceedings as defined in W.S.

26-28-101

, upon the order of a court of competent jurisdiction the commissioner shall yield the insurer’s assets held on deposit to the insurer’s receiver, conservator, rehabilitator or liquidator, or to any other properly designated official who succeeds to the management and control of the insurer’s assets.

No release of deposited assets shall be made except upon application to and the written order of the commissioner. The commissioner has no personal liability for any release of any deposit or part thereof he makes in good faith.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 151; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-151; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-8-114.
Commissioner's liability.

If the commissioner willfully fails to require, deposit, keep, account and receipt for, or surrender in the manner by law authorized or required any assets as provided in this code [title 26], he is responsible upon his official bond therefor and suit may be brought upon his bond by any person injured by the failure.

History.

Laws 1917, ch. 93, § 2; C.S. 1920, § 5252; R.S. 1931, § 57-410; C.S. 1945, § 52-1010; W.S. 1957, §§ 26-27, 26.1-152; Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 152; 1983, ch. 190, § 1.